Hawaii statutes.
[§342E-2] Nonpoint source pollution
management and control program; rules. (a) There is established within
the department a nonpoint source pollution management and control program to
administer, enforce, and carry out all laws, rules, and programs relating to
nonpoint source pollution in the State. The program may request the assistance
of the clean water branch staff of the department, whenever necessary, in
administering this chapter and, upon request, shall assist in the
implementation and enforcement of chapter 342D.

(b) The nonpoint source pollution management
and control program shall administer this chapter through the director. The
director may delegate to any person the power and authority vested in the
director by this chapter as the director deems reasonable and proper for the
effective administration of this chapter, except the power to make rules. [L
1993, c 345, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next